Washington statutes.
RCW 35.101.060

Notice of hearing.

Notice of a hearing held under RCW 35.101.030 shall be given by:

(1) One publication of the resolution of intention in a newspaper of general circulation in the city or county in which the area is to be established; and

(2) Mailing a complete copy of the resolution of intention to each lodging business in the proposed area.

Publication and mailing shall be completed at least ten days prior to the date and time of the hearing.

[ 2003 c 148 s 6.]